Illinois, session 104th, HB2958.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended by 5adding Section 17 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 205/17 new)7    Sec. 17. Career guide for postsecondary students with 8disabilities. The Board, in consultation with the Department 9of Commerce and Economic Opportunity and the Department of 10Employment Security, shall develop a career and education 11guide for postsecondary students with disabilities. The guide 12shall include information for undergraduate and graduate 13students with disabilities on available resources at 14institutions of higher education that support both the 15academic goals and future career paths of students. The career 16and education guide shall:17        (1) identify the availability of at each institution 18    of higher education in the State:19            (A) disability career centers, career counseling, 20        and placement services;21            (B) work-based learning options for students with 22        disabilities, including internships, cooperative 23        learning experiences, and independent study   HB2958- 2 -LRB104 08716 LNS 18770 b1        opportunities; and2            (C) accommodations and supports, such as 3        note-taker services, exam accommodations, accessible 4        seating, communication accommodations, specialty 5        textbooks and equipment, accessible parking, housing 6        and dining areas, and student groups;7        (2) provide broad-based career planning information 8    and guidance for undergraduate and graduate students with 9    disabilities on:10            (A) when, if, and how a student with a disability 11        may disclose the student's disability with a 12        prospective employer;13            (B) how to negotiate and request reasonable 14        accommodations on the job;15            (C) workers' rights for employees with 16        disabilities; and17            (D) assistive technologies and other supports 18        available to accommodate persons with disabilities in 19        the workplace; and20        (3) detail a list of national and regional 21    organizations, including contact information and websites, 22    specifically tailored to meet the unique challenges of job 23    seekers with disabilities.24    The guide shall be publicly available the websites of the 25Board, the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, 26and the Department of Employment Security.  HB2958- 3 -LRB104 08716 LNS 18770 b1    The Board may publish physical copies and charge a 2reasonable fee for individuals or institutions who wish to 3have a printed copy.4    The first guide shall be published by August 1, 2026 and 5annually thereafter by August 1 of each succeeding year 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 71, 2026.